Utah statutes.
62A-1-102.   Department of Human Services -- Creation.

There is created within state government the Department of  Human Services, which has all of the policymaking functions, regulatory and enforcement powers, rights, duties, and responsibilities outlined in this title.



Amended by Chapter 183, 1990 General Session

